Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Uniform Unclaimed Property Act

66-29-101. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.”

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Disposal of physical evidence, §18-1-206.

Disposal of property by sheriff, title 8, ch. 8, part 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Uses of unclaimed lottery prize money, OAG 03-066, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (5/22/03).

Effect of regulations issued by the comptroller of the currency, OAG 04-057, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (4/06/04).

66-29-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Apparent owner” means a person whose name appears on the records of a holder as the owner of property held, issued, or owing by the holder;

“Business association” means a for-profit or nonprofit corporation, joint stock company, investment company other than an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. §§ 80a-1 et seq.), partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, limited liability company, business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, insurance company, federally chartered entity, utility, sole proprietorship, or other business entity;

“Confidential information” has the same meaning as described in § 66-29-178;

“Domicile” means:

For a corporation, the state of its incorporation;

For a business association, other than a corporation, whose formation requires a filing with a state, the state of its filing;

For a federally chartered entity or an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, the state of its home office; and

For any other holder, the state of its principal place of business;

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

“Electronic mail” means any communication of information by electronic means that is automatically retained and stored and may be readily accessed or retrieved;

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, building and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank, bank, banking organization, or credit union;

“Game-related digital content” means digital content that exists only in an electronic game or electronic-game platform. “Game-related digital content”:

Includes:

Game-play currency such as a virtual wallet, even if denominated in United States currency; and

The following if for use or redemption only within that game or platform or another electronic game or electronic-game platform:

Points sometimes referred to as gems, tokens, gold, and similar names; and

Digital codes; and

Does not include an item that the issuer:

Permits to be redeemed for use outside of a game or platform for:

Money; or

Goods or services that have more than minimal value; or

Otherwise monetizes for use outside of a game or platform;

“Gift card”:

Means a stored-value card:

The value of which does not expire;

That may be decreased in value only by redemption for merchandise, goods, or services; and

That, unless required by law, must not be redeemed for or converted into money or otherwise monetized by the issuer; and

Includes a prepaid commercial mobile radio service, as that term is defined in 47 CFR 20.3;

“Holder” means a person obligated to hold for the account of, or to deliver or pay to, the owner of property that is subject to this part;

“Insurance company” means an insurer, not-for-profit hospital and medical corporation regulated under title 56, chapter 29, health maintenance organization, fraternal benefit society, or any person or entity required to obtain a certificate of authority or similar license from the department of commerce and insurance under title 56 in order to issue or enter into contracts of insurance in this state. “Insurance company” also includes any person or entity that has regulatory approval in its state of domicile to issue or enter into contracts of insurance and that would be required to obtain a certificate of authority or similar license from the department of commerce and insurance under title 56 if it issued or entered into contracts of insurance in this state;

“Local government” means any metropolitan government, municipality, or county located in this state;

“Loyalty card” means a record given without direct monetary consideration under an award, reward, benefit, loyalty, incentive, rebate, or promotional program that may be used or redeemed only to obtain goods or services or a discount on goods or services. “Loyalty card” does not include a record that may be redeemed for money or otherwise monetized by the issuer;

“Military medal” means any decoration or award that may be presented or awarded to a member of the armed forces of the United States or national guard;

“Mineral” means gas, oil, coal, oil shale, other gaseous liquid or solid hydrocarbon, cement material, sand and gravel, road material, building stone, chemical raw material, gemstone, fissionable and nonfissionable ores, colloidal and other clay, steam and other geothermal resources, and any other substance defined as a mineral by any other law of this state;

“Mineral proceeds” means an amount payable for extraction, production, or sale of minerals or, on the abandonment of the amount, the amount that becomes payable after abandonment. “Mineral proceeds” includes an amount payable:

For the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease, including, but not limited to, a bonus, royalty, compensatory royalty, shut-in royalty, minimum royalty, and delay rental;

For the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, including, but not limited to, a net revenue interest, royalty, overriding royalty, extraction payment, and production payment; and

Under an agreement or option, including, but not limited to, a joint operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling agreement, and farm out agreement;

“Money order” means a payment order for a specified amount of money and includes, but is not limited to, an express money order and a personal money order on which the remitter is the purchaser;

“Municipal bond” means a bond of evidence of indebtedness issued by a municipality or other political subdivision of a state;

“Net card value” means the original purchase price or original issued value of a stored-value card, plus amounts added to its original value and minus amounts used and any service charge, fee, or dormancy charge permitted by law;

“Non-freely transferable security” means a security that cannot be delivered to the treasurer by the Depository Trust & Clearing Corporation or a similar custodian of securities providing post-trade clearing and settlement services to financial markets, or that cannot be delivered because there is no agent to effect transfer. “Non-freely transferable security” includes a worthless security;

“Owner” means a person who has a legal, beneficial, or equitable interest in property subject to this part or the person's legal representative when acting on behalf of the owner. “Owner” includes:

A depositor, for a deposit;

A beneficiary, for a trust other than a deposit in trust;

A creditor, claimant, or payee, for other property; and

The lawful bearer of a record that may be used to obtain money, a reward, or a thing of value;

“Payroll card” means a record that evidences a payroll card account, as that term is defined in 12 CFR 1005.2;

“Person” means an individual, estate, business association, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, or other legal entity;

“Property” means tangible property described in §§66-29-109,30-2-702, and31-6-107 or a fixed and certain interest in intangible property held, issued, or owed in the course of a holder's business or by a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality. “Property”:

Includes all income from or increments to the property;

Includes property referred to as or evidenced by:

Money, virtual currency, interest, dividend, check, draft, deposit, or payroll card;

A credit balance, customer's overpayment, stored-value card, security deposit, refund, credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket for which the issuer has an obligation to provide a refund, mineral proceeds, or an unidentified remittance;

A security, other than:

A worthless security; or

A security that is subject to a lien, legal hold, or restriction evidenced on the records of the holder or imposed by operation of law, and that restricts the holder's or owner's ability to lawfully receive, transfer, sell, or otherwise negotiate the security;

A bond, debenture, note, or other evidence of indebtedness;

Money deposited to redeem a security, make a distribution, or pay a dividend;

An amount that has become due and payable by an insurance company in accordance with the terms of the applicable contract or as otherwise determined by this part;

An amount distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits; and

Does not include:

Game-related digital content;

A loyalty card;

An in-store credit for returned merchandise;

A gift card; or

A transit fare card;

“Putative holder” means a person believed by the treasurer to be a holder, until the person pays or delivers to the treasurer property subject to this part or until a final determination is made that the person is a holder;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Security” means:

A security interest, as that term is defined in §47-1-201; or

A security entitlement, as that term is defined in §47-8-102, including, but not limited to, a customer security account held by a registered broker-dealer, to the extent that the financial assets held in the security account are not registered on the books of the issuer in the name of, payable to the order of, or specifically endorsed to, the person for whom the broker-dealer holds the assets;

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Stored-value card”:

Means a record evidencing a promise made for consideration by the seller or issuer of the record that goods, services, or money will be provided to the owner of the record equal to the value or amount shown in the record;

Includes:

A record that contains or consists of a microprocessor chip, magnetic strip, or other means for the storage of information, which is prefunded and whose value or amount is decreased on each use and increased by payment of additional consideration; and

A payroll card; and

Does not include a loyalty card, transit fare card, gift card, or game-related digital content;

“Transit fare card” means any pass or instrument purchased to utilize public transportation facilities or services;

“Treasurer” means the state treasurer;

“Treasurer's agent” means a person with whom the treasurer contracts to conduct an examination under §66-29-157 on behalf of the treasurer and an independent contractor of the person. “Treasurer's agent” includes each individual participating in the examination on behalf of the person or contractor;

“Utility” means a person that owns or operates for public use a plant, equipment, real property, franchise, or license for the following public services:

The transmission of communications or information;

The production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas; or

The provision of sewage and septic services, trash or garbage services, or recycling disposal;

“Virtual currency” means a digital representation of value used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or a store of value that is not recognized by the United States as legal tender. “Virtual currency” does not include:

The software or protocols governing the transfer of the digital representation of value;

Game-related digital content; or

A loyalty card or gift card; and

“Worthless security” means a security whose cost of liquidation and delivery would exceed the value of the security on the date a report is due under this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1; 2019, ch. 11, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (24)(C)(v) to the definition of “Property”; substituted “loyalty card, transit fare card,” for “loyalty card,” in the definition of “‘Stored-value card’” in (30)(C); and added the definition of “‘Transit fare card’”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 11, § 4. March 13, 2019.

66-29-103. Inapplicability to foreign transactions.

This part does not apply to property held, due, and owing in a foreign country if the transaction involving the property was a wholly foreign transaction.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-104. Promulgation of rules.

The treasurer may promulgate rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to carry out this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-104 was transferred to §66-29-105.

Acts 2011, ch. 285, § 6 provided that §§ 3-5 of the act, which amended former §§66-29-104 and former66-29-115, shall apply to all military medals that are removed from a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository or agency or collateral deposit box after July 1, 2011.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-105. Presumption of abandonment of various types of property.

Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-113, property is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner at the time specified for the following property:

A traveler's check, fifteen (15) years after issuance;

A money order, seven (7) years after issuance;

A state or municipal bond, a bearer bond, or an original-issue-discount bond, three (3) years after the earlier of the date the bond matures or the date the bond is called or the obligation to pay the principal of the bond arises;

A debt of a business association, three (3) years after the obligation to pay arises;

A payroll card or demand, savings, or a time deposit, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, three (3) years after the earlier of maturity or the date of the last indication of interest in the property by the apparent owner; provided, that a deposit that is automatically renewable is deemed matured on its initial date of maturity unless the apparent owner consented in a record on file with the holder to a renewal at or about the time of the renewal;

Money or credits owed to a customer as a result of a retail business transaction, other than in-store credit for returned merchandise, three (3) years after the obligation arose;

An amount owed by an insurance company on a life or endowment insurance policy or an annuity contract that has matured or terminated, three (3) years after the obligation to pay arose under the terms of the policy or contract or, if a policy or contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death has not matured by proof of death of the insured or annuitant, three (3) years after the earlier of the date:

The insurance company has knowledge of the death of the insured or annuitant; or

The insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve for the policy or contract is based;

Property distributable by a business association in the course of dissolution, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a court, including property received as proceeds of a class action, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

Property held by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, including municipal bond interest and unredeemed principal under the administration of a paying agent or indenture trustee, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;

Wages, commissions, bonuses, or reimbursements as to which an employee is entitled, or other compensation for personal services, other than amounts held in a payroll card, one (1) year after the amount becomes payable;

A deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one (1) year after the deposit or refund becomes payable;

Property payable or distributable in the course of the demutualization of an insurance company, three (3) years after the earlier of the date of last contact with the policyholder or the date the property became payable or distributable; and

All other property not specified in this section or § 66-29-106, § 66-29-107, § 66-29-108, § 66-29-109, § 66-29-110, or § 66-29-111, the earlier of three (3) years after the owner first has a right to demand the property or the obligation to pay or distribute the property arises.

Notwithstanding § 66-29-113, property whose owner is known to the holder to have died and left no one to take the property by will and no one to take the property by intestate succession, is presumed abandoned without regard to any activity or inactivity within specified abandonment periods.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, any outstanding check, draft, credit balance, customer's overpayment, or unidentified remittance issued to a business entity or association as part of a commercial transaction in the ordinary course of a holder's business is not presumed abandoned if the holder and such business entity or association have an ongoing business relationship. An ongoing business relationship is deemed to exist if the holder has engaged in a commercial, business, or professional transaction involving the sale, lease, license, or purchase of goods or services with the business entity or association or a predecessor-in-interest of the business entity or association within the dormancy period immediately following the date of the check, draft, credit balance, customer's overpayment, or unidentified remittance giving rise to the unclaimed property interest. A transaction between the holder and a third-party insurer of another is a commercial transaction which constitutes an ongoing business relationship between the holder and the insurer.

As used in this subsection (c):

“Dormancy period” means the period during which a holder may hold a property interest before it is presumed to be abandoned; and

“Predecessor-in-interest” is a person or entity whose interest in a business entity or association was acquired by its successor-in-interest, whether by purchase of the business ownership interest, purchase of business assets, statutory merger, consolidation, or a successive acquisition by whatever means accomplished.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-106. Presumption of abandonment of
tax-deferred retirement account.

Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-113, and except for property held in a governmental plan, as that term is defined in 26 U.S.C. § 414, property held in a pension account or retirement account that qualifies for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States, is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three (3) years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, or, if the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The earlier of:

The date the apparent owner becomes seventy and one-half (70 ½) years of age, if determinable by the holder; or

If the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) requires distribution, two (2) years after the date the holder in the ordinary course of its business receives confirmation of the death of the apparent owner.

If a holder in the ordinary course of its business receives notice or an indication of the death of an apparent owner and subdivision (a)(2) applies, the holder shall attempt, not later than ninety (90) days after receipt of the notice or indication, to confirm whether the apparent owner is deceased.

If the apparent owner of an account described in subsection (a) does not receive communications from the holder by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner's interest in the property by sending the apparent owner an electronic mail communication not later than two (2) years after the apparent owner's last indication of interest in the property. If the holder receives notification that the electronic mail communication was not received, or if the apparent owner does not respond to the electronic mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent, the holder shall promptly attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail. If the mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, the property is presumed abandoned three (3) years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication to contact the apparent owner sent by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, or, if the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The date established by subdivision (a)(2).

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-106 was transferred to §66-29-107.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-107. Presumption of abandonment of other tax-deferred accounts.

Except as otherwise provided in §66-29-113, and except for property described in §66-29-106, property held in a governmental plan, as that term is defined in 26 U.S.C. § 414, and property held in a program described in Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 529A), property held in an account or plan, including a health savings account, that qualifies for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the owner three (3) years after the earlier of:

The date, if determinable by the holder, specified in the income tax laws and regulations of the United States by which distribution of the property must begin to avoid a tax penalty, with no distribution having been made; or

Thirty (30) years after the date the account was opened.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-107 was transferred to §66-29-108.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-108. Presumption of abandonment of custodial account for minor.

Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-113, property held in an account established under title 35, chapter 7, is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by or on behalf of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened three (3) years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service, or, if the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days after the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The date on which the minor on whose behalf the account was opened reaches the statutory age of majority in accordance with title 35, chapter 7, under which the account was opened.

If the custodian of the minor on whose behalf an account described in subsection (a) was opened does not receive communications from the holder by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the custodian's interest in the property by sending the custodian an electronic mail communication not later than two (2) years after the custodian's last indication of interest in the property. If the holder receives notification that the electronic mail communication was not received, or if the custodian does not respond to the electronic mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent, the holder shall promptly attempt to contact the custodian by first-class United States mail. If the mail is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service, the property is presumed abandoned three (3) years after the later of:

The date a second consecutive communication to contact the custodian by first-class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

The date established by subdivision (a)(2).

When the minor on whose behalf an account described in subsection (a) reaches the age required for transfer to a minor of custodial property under applicable law, the property in the account is no longer subject to this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-108 was transferred to §66-29-109.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.